Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.900

Application—2007 c 269.

(1) The provisions of this act apply to registered dental assistants effective July 1, 2008.

(2) The provisions of this act apply to expanded function dental auxiliaries effective December 1, 2008.

[ 2007 c 269 s 21.]